Vermont, session 2025-2026, H66.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Write-In Candidates Thresholds for Primary Elections * * *
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2370 is amended to read:
§ 2370. WRITE-IN CANDIDATES
VT LEG #378432 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.66
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) A write-in candidate shall not qualify as a primary winner unless he or
she the candidate receives at least one-half the same number of votes as the
number of signatures required for his or her the candidate’s office on a primary
petition, except that if a write-in candidate receives more votes than a any
other candidate whose name is printed on the ballot, he or she the write-in
candidate may qualify as a primary winner.
(b) The write-in candidate who qualifies as a primary winner under this
section must still be determined a winner under section 2369 of this chapter
before he or she the candidate becomes the party’s candidate in the general
election.
* * * Failure of a Major Political Party to Nominate a Candidate by Primary
* * *
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2381 is amended to read:
§ 2381. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
(a) A candidate may also be nominated and have the candidate’s name
printed on the general election ballot in accordance with the provisions set
forth in this subchapter, in the following instances:
(1) In in case of a vacancy on the general election ballot occasioned by
death, removal, or withdrawal of a candidate, or but not for the failure of a
major political party to nominate a candidate by primary;
VT LEG #378432 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.66
2025 Page 3 of 3
(2) In in case a minor political party desires to nominate a candidate for
any office for which major political parties nominate candidates by primary or
for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States; and
(3) In in case of nomination for the office of justice of the peace, in the
event that such nomination has not already been made by caucus as provided in
section 2413 of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2386 is amended to read:
§ 2386. TIME FOR FILING STATEMENTS
(a) In the case of the failure of a major political party to nominate a
candidate by primary, a statement shall be filed not later than 5:00 p.m. on the
sixth day following the primary. [Repealed.]
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378432 v.1